Nevada, session 83, AB278.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 236 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The month of July of each year is designated as “Muslim
American Heritage Month” in this State.
2. The Governor shall issue annually a proclamation
encouraging the observance of Muslim American Heritage
Month. The proclamation may, without limitation, call upon the
news media, state and local officers, private nonprofit groups and
foundations, schools, businesses and other public and private
entities to bring to the attention of Nevada’s residents the
important contributions Muslim Americans have made to the State
of Nevada and the United States.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)